Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 10 Absentee Voting
21-2-386.
Safekeeping, certification, and validation of absentee ballots; rejection of ballot; delivery of ballots to location designated by superintendent; duties of superintendent and managers; precinct returns; report of returns of verified and accepted absentee ballots cast as soon as possible following closing of polls; notification of challenged elector; unlawful disclosure of tabulation results.

The board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall keep safely, unopened, and stored in a manner that will prevent tampering and unauthorized access all official absentee ballots received from absentee electors prior to the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election except as otherwise provided in this subsection.

Upon receipt of each ballot, a registrar or clerk shall write the day and hour of the receipt of the ballot on its envelope. The registrar or clerk shall then compare the number of the elector’s Georgia driver’s license number or state identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40 and date of birth entered on the absentee ballot envelope with the same information contained in the elector’s voter registration records. If the elector has affirmed on the envelope that he or she does not have a Georgia driver’s license or state identification card issued pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 40, the registrar or clerk shall compare the last four digits of the elector’s social security number and date of birth entered on the envelope with the same information contained in the elector’s voter registration records. The registrar or clerk shall also confirm that the elector signed the oath and the person assisting the elector, if any, signed the required oath. If the elector has signed the elector’s oath, the person assisting has signed the required oath, if applicable, and the identifying information entered on the absentee ballot envelope matches the same information contained in the elector’s voter registration record, the registrar or clerk shall so certify by signing or initialing his or her name below the voter’s oath. Each elector’s name so certified shall be listed by the registrar or clerk on the numbered list of absentee voters prepared for his or her precinct.

If the elector has failed to sign the oath, or if the identifying information entered on the absentee ballot envelope does not match the same information appearing in the elector’s voter registration record, or if the elector has failed to furnish required information or information so furnished does not conform with that on file in the registrar’s or clerk’s office, or if the elector is otherwise found disqualified to vote, the registrar or clerk shall write across the face of the envelope “Rejected,” giving the reason therefor. The board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall promptly notify the elector of such rejection, a copy of which notification shall be retained in the files of the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk for at least two years. Such elector shall have until the end of the period for verifying provisional ballots contained in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-419 to cure the problem resulting in the rejection of the ballot. The elector may cure a failure to sign the oath, nonmatching identifying information, or missing information by submitting an affidavit to the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk along with a copy of one of the forms of identification enumerated in subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-417 before the close of such period. The affidavit shall affirm that the ballot was submitted by the elector, is the elector’s ballot, and that the elector is registered and qualified to vote in the primary, election, or runoff in question. If the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk finds the affidavit and identification to be sufficient, the absentee ballot shall be counted.

An elector who registered to vote by mail, but did not comply with subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-220, and who votes for the first time in this state by absentee ballot shall include with his or her application for an absentee ballot or in the outer oath envelope of his or her absentee ballot either one of the forms of identification listed in subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-417 or a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows the name and address of such elector. If such elector does not provide any of the forms of identification listed in this subparagraph with his or her application for an absentee ballot or with the absentee ballot, such absentee ballot shall be deemed to be a provisional ballot and such ballot shall only be counted if the registrars are able to verify current and valid identification of the elector as provided in this subparagraph within the time period for verifying provisional ballots pursuant to Code Section 21-2-419. The board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall promptly notify the elector that such ballot is deemed a provisional ballot and shall provide information on the types of identification needed and how and when such identification is to be submitted to the board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk to verify the ballot.

Three copies of the numbered list of voters shall also be prepared for such rejected absentee electors, giving the name of the elector and the reason for the rejection in each case. Three copies of the numbered list of certified absentee voters and three copies of the numbered list of rejected absentee voters for each precinct shall be turned over to the poll manager in charge of counting the absentee ballots and shall be distributed as required by law for numbered lists of voters.

All absentee ballots returned to the board or absentee ballot clerk after the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election shall be safely kept unopened by the board or absentee ballot clerk and then transferred to the appropriate clerk for storage for the period of time required for the preservation of ballots used at the primary or election and shall then, without being opened, be destroyed in like manner as the used ballots of the primary or election. The board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall promptly notify the elector by first-class mail that the elector’s ballot was returned too late to be counted and that the elector will not receive credit for voting in the primary or election. All such late absentee ballots shall be delivered to the appropriate clerk and stored as provided in Code Section 21-2-390.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, until the United States Department of Defense notifies the Secretary of State that the Department of Defense has implemented a system of expedited absentee voting for those electors covered by this subparagraph, absentee ballots cast in a primary, election, or runoff by eligible absentee electors who reside outside the county or municipality in which the primary, election, or runoff is held and are members of the armed forces of the United States, members of the merchant marine of the United States, spouses or dependents of members of the armed forces or merchant marine residing with or accompanying such members, or overseas citizens that are postmarked by the date of such primary, election, or runoff and are received within the three-day period following such primary, election, or runoff, if proper in all other respects, shall be valid ballots and shall be counted and included in the certified election results.

Beginning at 8:00 A.M. on the third Monday prior to the day of the primary, election, or runoff, the election superintendent shall be authorized to open the outer oath envelope of absentee ballots that have been verified and accepted pursuant to subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this Code section, remove the contents of such outer envelope, open the inner envelope marked “Official Absentee Ballot,” and scan the absentee ballot using one or more ballot scanners. At least three persons who are registrars, deputy registrars, poll workers, or absentee ballot clerks must be present before commencing; and three persons who are registrars, deputy registrars, or absentee ballot clerks shall be present at all times while the absentee ballot envelopes are being opened and the absentee ballots are being scanned. However, no person shall tally, tabulate, estimate, or attempt to tally, tabulate, or estimate or cause the ballot scanner or any other equipment to produce any tally or tabulate, partial or otherwise, of the absentee ballots cast until the time for the closing of the polls on the day of the primary, election, or runoff except as provided in this Code section. Prior to beginning the process set forth in this paragraph, the superintendent shall provide written notice to the Secretary of State in writing at least seven days prior to processing and scanning absentee ballots. Such notice shall contain the dates, start and end times, and location or locations where absentee ballots will be processed and scanned. The superintendent shall also post such notice publicly in a prominent location in the superintendent’s office and on the home page of the county election superintendent’s website, if the county election superintendent maintains such a website. The Secretary of State shall publish on his or her website the information he or she receives from superintendents stating the dates, times, and locations where absentee ballots will be processed.

The proceedings set forth in this paragraph shall be open to the view of the public, but no person except one employed and designated by the superintendent shall touch any ballot or ballot container. Any person involved in processing and scanning absentee ballots shall swear an oath, in the same form as the oath for poll officers provided in Code Section 21-2-95, prior to beginning the processing and scanning of absentee ballots. The county executive committee or, if there is no organized county executive committee, the state executive committee of each political party and political body having candidates whose names appear on the ballot for such election shall have the right to designate two persons and each independent and nonpartisan candidate whose name appears on the ballot for such election shall have the right to designate one person to act as monitors for such process. In the event that the only issue to be voted upon in an election is a referendum question, the superintendent shall also notify in writing the chief judge of the superior court of the county who shall appoint two electors of the county to monitor such process. While viewing or monitoring the process set forth in this paragraph, monitors and observers shall be prohibited from:

In any way interfering with the processing or scanning of absentee ballots or the conduct of the election;

Using or bringing into the room any photographic or other electronic monitoring or recording devices, cellular telephones, or computers;

Engaging in any form of campaigning or campaign activity;

Taking any action that endangers the secrecy and security of the ballots;

Touching any ballot or ballot container;

Tallying, tabulating, estimating, or attempting to tally, tabulate, or estimate, whether partial or otherwise, any of the votes on the absentee ballots cast; and

Communicating any information that they see while monitoring the processing and scanning of the absentee ballots, whether intentionally or inadvertently, about any ballot, vote, or selection to anyone other than an election official who needs such information to lawfully carry out his or her official duties.

The State Election Board shall promulgate rules requiring reconciliation procedures; prompt and undelayed scanning of ballots after absentee ballot envelopes are opened; secrecy of election results prior to the closing of the polls on the day of a primary, election, or runoff; and other protections to protect the integrity of the process set forth in this paragraph.

A county election superintendent may, in his or her discretion, after 7:00 A.M. on the day of the primary, election, or runoff begin tabulating the absentee ballots. If the county election superintendent chooses to open the inner envelopes and begin tabulating such ballots prior to the close of the polls on the day of the primary, election, or runoff, the superintendent shall notify in writing, at least seven days prior to the primary, election, or runoff, the Secretary of State of the superintendent’s intent to begin the absentee ballot tabulation prior to the close of the polls. The county executive committee or, if there is no organized county executive committee, the state executive committee of each political party and political body having candidates whose names appear on the ballot for such election in such county shall have the right to designate two persons and each independent and nonpartisan candidate whose name appears on the ballot for such election in such county shall have the right to designate one person to act as monitors for such process. In the event that the only issue to be voted upon in an election is a referendum question, the superintendent shall also notify in writing the chief judge of the superior court of the county who shall appoint two electors of the county to monitor such process.

The county election superintendent shall publish a written notice in the superintendent’s office of the superintendent’s intent to begin the absentee ballot tabulation prior to the close of the polls and publish such notice at least one week prior to the primary, election, or runoff in the legal organ of the county.

The process for opening absentee ballot envelopes, scanning absentee ballots, and tabulating absentee ballots on the day of a primary, election, or runoff as provided in this subsection shall be conducted in a manner to maintain the secrecy of all ballots and to protect the disclosure of any balloting information before 7:00 P.M. on election day. No absentee ballots shall be tabulated before 7:00 A.M. on the day of a primary, election, or runoff.

All persons conducting the tabulation of absentee ballots during the day of a primary, election, or runoff, including the vote review panel required by Code Section 21-2-483, and all monitors and observers shall be sequestered until the time for the closing of the polls. All such persons shall have no contact with the news media; shall have no contact with other persons not involved in monitoring, observing, or conducting the tabulation; shall not use any type of communication device including radios, telephones, and cellular telephones; shall not utilize computers for the purpose of email, instant messaging, or other forms of communication; and shall not communicate any information concerning the tabulation until the time for the closing of the polls; provided, however, that supervisory and technical assistance personnel shall be permitted to enter and leave the area in which the tabulation is being conducted but shall not communicate any information concerning the tabulation to anyone other than the county election superintendent; the staff of the superintendent; those persons conducting, observing, or monitoring the tabulation; and those persons whose technical assistance is needed for the tabulation process to operate.

The absentee ballots shall be tabulated in accordance with the procedures of this chapter for the tabulation of absentee ballots. As such ballots are tabulated, they shall be placed into locked ballot boxes and may be transferred to locked ballot bags, if needed, for security. The persons conducting the tabulation of the absentee ballots shall not cause the tabulating equipment to produce any count, partial or otherwise, of the absentee votes cast until the time for the closing of the polls except as otherwise provided in this Code section.

When requested by the superintendent, but not earlier than the third Monday prior to a primary, election, or runoff, a registrar or absentee ballot clerk shall deliver the official absentee ballot of each certified absentee elector, each rejected absentee ballot, applications for such ballots, and copies of the numbered lists of certified and rejected absentee electors to the location designated by the superintendent, and the superintendent or official receiving such absentee ballots shall issue his or her receipt therefor.

The superintendent shall cause the verified and accepted absentee ballots to be opened and tabulated as provided in this Code section. A manager shall then open the outer envelope in such manner as not to destroy the oath printed thereon and shall deposit the inner envelope marked “Official Absentee Ballot” in a ballot box reserved for absentee ballots. In the event that an outer envelope is found to contain an absentee ballot that is not in an inner envelope, the ballot shall be sealed in an inner envelope, initialed and dated by the person sealing the inner envelope, and deposited in the ballot box and counted in the same manner as other absentee ballots, provided that such ballot is otherwise proper. Such manager with two assistant managers, appointed by the superintendent, with such clerks as the manager deems necessary shall count the absentee ballots following the procedures prescribed by this chapter for other ballots, insofar as practicable.

All absentee ballots shall be counted and tabulated in such a manner that returns may be reported by precinct; and separate returns shall be made for each precinct in which absentee ballots were cast showing the results by each precinct in which the electors reside. The superintendent shall utilize the procedures set forth in this Code section to ensure that the returns of verified and accepted absentee ballots cast are reported to the public as soon as possible following the closing of the polls on the day of the primary, election, or runoff. Failure to utilize these procedures to ensure that the returns of verified and accepted absentee ballots are reported as soon as possible following the close of polls shall subject the superintendent to sanctions by the State Election Board. If a superintendent fails to report the returns of verified and accepted absentee ballots by the day following the election at 5:00 P.M., the State Election Board may convene an independent performance review board pursuant to Code Section 21-2-107.

If an absentee elector’s right to vote has been challenged for cause, a poll officer shall write “Challenged,” the elector’s name, and the alleged cause of challenge on the outer envelope and shall deposit the ballot in a secure, sealed ballot box; and it shall be counted as other challenged ballots are counted. Where direct recording electronic voting systems are used for absentee balloting and a challenge to an elector’s right to vote is made prior to the time that the elector votes, the elector shall vote on a paper or optical scanning ballot and such ballot shall be handled as provided in this subsection. The board of registrars or absentee ballot clerk shall promptly notify the elector of such challenge.

It shall be unlawful at any time prior to the close of the polls for any person to disclose or for any person to receive any information regarding the results of the tabulation of absentee ballots except as expressly provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 186, §§ 11, 12, 14; Code 1933, §§ 34-3311, 34-3312, 34-3314; Ga. L. 1955, p. 204, § 5; Code 1933, § 34-1407, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 280, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 71, §§ 9-11; Ga. L. 1977, p. 725, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 32; Ga. L. 1979, p. 629, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1815, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 32; Ga. L. 1997, p. 662, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 16, 39; Ga. L. 1999, p. 29, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 34; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 21; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 40; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 54/HB 244; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2007, p. 544, § 4/SB 194; Ga. L. 2008, p. 261, § 1/SB 456; Ga. L. 2008, p. 448, § 4/SB 387; Ga. L. 2009, p. 300, § 1/HB 86; Ga. L. 2011, p. 590, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 13/SB 82; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, §§ 27, 28/SB 92; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 32/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 29/SB 202.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, added the third through sixth sentences in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) and added the last sentence in subparagraph (a)(1)(D).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subparagraph (a)(1)(B); in subparagraph (a)(1)(C), substituted “the identifying information entered on the absentee ballot envelope does not match the same information appearing in the elector’s vote registration record” for “the signature does not appear to be valid” near the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “nonmatching identifying information” for “an invalid signature” near the beginning of the fourth sentence; rewrote paragraph (a)(2); deleted “open the inner envelopes in accordance with the procedures prescribed in this subsection and” following “election, or runoff” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3); in paragraph (a)(5), substituted “absentee ballot envelopes, scanning absentee ballots, and” for “the inner envelopes of and” and “conducted in a manner” for “a confidential process” in the first sentence; substituted “email” for “e-mail” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(6); and added “except as otherwise provided in this Code section” at the end of paragraph (a)(7); rewrote subsection (b); in subsection (c), substituted “The superintendent shall cause the verified and accepted absentee ballots to be opened and tabulated as provided in this Code section. A manager” for “Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, after the close of the polls on the day of the primary, election, or runoff, a manager” at the beginning and deleted “, and prepare an election return for the county or municipality showing the results of the absentee ballots cast in such county or municipality.” at the end; and added the second through fourth sentences in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Provisional absentee ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.03.

Reporting requirements for absentee ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.04.

Acceptance of absentee ballots from military and overseas citizens, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.10.

Mailing and issuance of ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.11.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

21-2-387.
Pilot program for electronic handling of absentee ballots; requirements for pilot program; reporting; termination of pilot program.

The Secretary of State shall develop and implement a pilot program for the electronic transmission, receipt, and counting of absentee ballots by persons who are entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973ff, et seq., as amended, for use in a primary or a general election.

Such pilot program shall provide, at a minimum, for:

The encryption of information and the transmission of such information over a secure network;

The authentication of such information;

The verification of the identity and eligibility of the elector to vote in the primary, election, or runoff, as the case may be;

The protection of the privacy, anonymity, and integrity of the ballots cast;

The prevention of the casting of multiple ballots by the same elector in a primary, election, or runoff;

The prevention of any tampering, abuse, fraudulent use, or illegal manipulation of such system;

The uninterrupted reliability of such system for casting ballots by qualified voters;

The capability of the elector to determine if the electronic transmission of the ballot was successful;

The ability to audit such ballots and to verify that such ballots were properly counted; and

The ability to verify that the information transmitted over the secure network was not viewed or altered by sites that lie between the voting location and the vote counting destination.

The Secretary of State shall develop procedures by which persons who are eligible to utilize the pilot program to vote shall be notified of its availability and the procedures and methods for its utilization.

The provisions of this article shall apply to ballots requested, transmitted, voted, received, and counted under this pilot program as nearly as practicable, but the Secretary of State and the State Election Board shall be authorized to vary such provisions by rule or regulation as necessary to accomplish the goals of this pilot program, provided that such variances shall retain and maintain the same degree of security and integrity of such ballots as provided by this article although in different forms or formats as necessitated by the technology utilized in such pilot program. The Secretary of State and the State Election Board are authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section and to provide for such variances to this article as needed pursuant to this subsection.

The Secretary of State shall review the results of the pilot program and shall provide the members of the General Assembly with a comprehensive report no later than 90 days following the primary or general election in which such pilot program is used on the effectiveness of such pilot program with any recommendations for its continued use and any needed changes in such program for future primaries and elections.

The pilot program shall be used in the first primary or general election following:

The inclusion in the Appropriations Act of a specific line item appropriation for funding of such pilot program or a determination by the Secretary of State that there is adequate funding through public or private funds, or a combination of public and private funds, to conduct the pilot program; provided, however, that no funds shall be accepted from registered political parties or political bodies for this purpose; and

Certification by the Secretary of State that such pilot program is feasible and can be implemented for such primary or general election.

This Code section shall be repealed by operation of law on July 1 of the year following the conclusion of the pilot program.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-387

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 807, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 14/SB 82.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the procedure for ballots of deceased electors. The former Code section was based on Code 1933, § 34-1408, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 55/HB 244, effective July 1, 2005.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 807, § 1/HB 665 provides for the creation by the Secretary of State of a pilot program for electronic transmission of absentee ballots by military and overseas citizens and for the repeal by operation of law on July 1 of the year following the conclusion of the pilot program. As of June 2022, the pilot program has not concluded.

21-2-388.
Cancellation of absentee ballots of electors who are present in election precinct during primaries and elections.

When an absentee ballot which has been voted shall be returned to and received by the board of registrars, it shall be deemed to have been voted then and there; and no other ballot shall be issued to the same elector. If an elector has requested to vote by absentee ballot and has not received such absentee ballot, has such ballot in his or her possession, has not yet returned such ballot, or has returned such ballot but the registrars have not received such ballot, such elector may have the absentee ballot canceled and vote in person on the day of the primary, election, or runoff in one of the following ways:

If the elector is in possession of the ballot, by surrendering the absentee ballot to the poll manager of the precinct in which the elector’s name appears on the electors list and then being permitted to vote the regular ballot. The poll manager shall mark “Canceled” and the date and time across the face of the absentee ballot and shall initial same. The poll manager shall also make appropriate notations beside the name of the elector on the electors list. All such canceled absentee ballots shall be returned with other ballots to the superintendent; or

If the elector has not received the ballot, has not yet returned the ballot, or if the elector has returned the ballot but the registrars have not received the ballot, by appearing in person before the managers of the elector’s precinct, the registrars, or the absentee ballot clerk and requesting in writing that the envelope containing the elector’s absentee ballot be marked “Canceled.” After having satisfied themselves as to the identity of such elector and confirming that the elector’s absentee ballot has not yet been received by the board of registrars, the registrars or the absentee ballot clerk shall grant the request and shall notify the managers of the elector’s precinct as to such action so as to permit the elector to vote in person in that precinct. If the absentee ballot is in the mail, has not yet been returned, or its exact location is unknown, the registrar or the absentee ballot clerk shall write “Canceled” beside the elector’s name on the master list of absentee voters and shall cancel the ballot itself as soon as it is received. If the location of the requested absentee ballot is known to the elector and it has not been surrendered to the poll manager, the elector shall destroy the absentee ballot after casting his or her vote in person. Canceled absentee ballots shall be disposed of in the same manner as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-386 for absentee ballots returned too late to be cast.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1409, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 71, § 12; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 23; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 33; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 544, § 5/SB 194; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 33/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, inserted “has not yet returned such ballot,” in the middle of the second sentence of the introductory language; in paragraph (2), in the first sentence, inserted “, has not yet returned the ballot,” near the beginning, inserted “the managers of the elector’s precinct,” and inserted a comma following “registrars” in the middle, in the second sentence, inserted “and confirming that the elector’s absentee ballot has not yet been received by the board of registrars” in the middle, in the third sentence, inserted “, has not yet been returned,” near the middle, and added the fourth sentence.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Spoiled absentee ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.06.

Voted absentee ballots, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Absentee Voting, § 183-1-14-.09.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-389.
Payment of postage for mailing absentee ballots.

The postage required for mailing ballots to absentee electors, as provided for in this article, shall be paid by the county or municipality, except in cases where free mail delivery is furnished by the federal government.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1410, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.